California statutes. Education Code
(a) All names, whether real or fictitious, of the person, firm, association, partnership, or corporation under which it has done and is doing business.

(b) The address, including city and street, of every place of doing business of the person, firm, association, partnership, or corporation within the State of California.

(c) The address, including city and street, of the location of the records of the person, firm, association, partnership, or corporation, and the name and address, including city and street, of the custodian of such records.

(d) The names and addresses, including city and street, of the directors, if any, and principal officers of the person, firm, association, partnership, or corporation.

(e) The school enrollment, by grades, number of teachers, coeducational or enrollment limited to boys or girls and boarding facilities.

(f) That the following records are maintained at the address stated, and are true and accurate:

(1) The records required to be kept by Section 48222.

(2) The courses of study offered by the institution.

(3) The names and addresses, including city and street, of its faculty, together with a record of the educational qualifications of each.

(g) Criminal record summary information has been obtained pursuant to Section 44237.

Whenever two or more private schools are under the effective control or supervision of a single administrative unit, such administrative unit may comply with the provisions of this section on behalf of each of the schools under its control or supervision by submitting one report.

Filing pursuant to this section shall not be interpreted to mean, and it shall be unlawful for any school to expressly or impliedly represent by any means whatsoever, that the State of California, the Superintendent of Public Instruction, the State Board of Education, the State Department of Education, or any division or bureau of the department, or any accrediting agency has made any evaluation, recognition, approval, or endorsement of the school or course unless this is an actual fact.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall prepare and publish a list of private elementary and high schools to include the name and address of the school and the name of the school owner or administrator.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 72, Sec. 1.   Effective April 25, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

33191.

(a) Commencing October 1, 1985, the affidavit or statement filed with the Superintendent of Public Instruction pursuant to Section 33190 shall, under penalty of perjury, include a statement manifesting compliance with the provisions of Section 44237.

(b) In the case of any private school where the instructor also serves as the administrator of the school, the affidavit or statement shall be made available upon request to the parents or guardians of all pupils currently enrolled in the school and to any parent or guardian considering whether to enroll his or her child in the school.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 72, Sec. 2.   Effective April 25, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

33192.

(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), if the employees of any entity that has a contract with a private school to provide any of the following services may have any contact with pupils, those employees shall submit or have submitted their fingerprints in a manner authorized by the Department of Justice together with a fee determined by the Department of Justice to be sufficient to reimburse the department for its costs incurred in processing the application:

(1) School and classroom janitorial.

(2) Schoolsite administrative.

(3) Schoolsite grounds
 and landscape maintenance.

(4) Pupil transportation.

(5) Schoolsite food-related.

(b) This section does not apply to an entity providing any of the services listed in subdivision (a) to a private school in an emergency or exceptional situation, such as when pupil health or safety is endangered or when repairs are needed to make school facilities safe and habitable.

(c) This section does not apply to an entity providing any of the services listed in subdivision (a) to a private school when the private school determines that the employees of the entity will have limited contact with pupils. In determining whether a contract employee has limited contact with
 pupils, the private school shall consider the totality of the circumstances, including factors such as the length of time the contractors will be on school grounds, whether pupils will be in proximity with the site where the contractors will be working, and whether the contractors will be working by themselves or with others. If a private school has made this determination, the private school shall take appropriate steps to protect the safety of any pupils that may come in contact with these employees.

(d) A private school may determine, on a case-by-case basis, to require an entity providing schoolsite services other than those listed in subdivision (a) or those described in Section 33193 and the entity’s employees to comply with the requirements of this section, unless the private school determines that the employees of the entity
 will have limited contact with pupils. In determining whether a contract employee will have limited contact with pupils, the private school shall consider the totality of the circumstances, including factors such as the length of time the contractors will be on school grounds, whether pupils will be in proximity with the site where the contractors will be working, and whether the contractors will be working by themselves or with others. If a private school makes this determination, the private school shall take appropriate steps to protect the safety of any pupils that may come in contact with these employees. If a private school requires an entity providing services other than those listed in subdivision (a) and its employees to comply with the requirements of this section, the Department of Justice shall comply with subdivision (e).

(e) A request for records pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be conducted pursuant to Section 11105.3 of the Penal Code. The Department of Justice shall provide a state and federal response pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(f) An entity having a contract as specified in subdivision (a) and an entity required to comply with this section pursuant to subdivision (d) shall not permit an employee to come in contact with pupils until the Department of Justice has ascertained that the employee has not been convicted of a felony as defined in Section 45122.1.

(1) This prohibition does not apply to an employee solely on the basis that the employee has been convicted of a felony if the employee has obtained a certificate of rehabilitation and pardon pursuant
 to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 4852.01) of Title 6 of Part 3 of the Penal Code.

(2) This prohibition does not apply to an employee solely on the basis that the employee has been convicted of a serious felony that is not also a violent felony if that employee can prove to the sentencing court of the offense in question, by clear and convincing evidence, that they have been rehabilitated for the purposes of schoolsite employment for at least one year. If the offense in question occurred outside this state, then the person may seek a finding of rehabilitation from the court having jurisdiction where they are a resident.

(g) An entity having a contract as specified in subdivision (a) and an entity required to comply with this section pursuant to subdivision (d) shall
 certify in writing to the private school that neither the employer nor any of its employees who are required by this section to submit or have their fingerprints submitted to the Department of Justice and who may come in contact with pupils have been convicted of a felony as defined in Section 45122.1.

(h) An entity having a contract as specified in subdivision (a) on the effective date of the act adding this section and an entity required to comply with this section pursuant to subdivision (d) by a private school with which it has a contract on the effective date of the act adding this section shall complete the requirements of this section within 90 days of that date.

(i) For purposes of this section, “private school” means a person, firm, association, partnership, or corporation
 offering or conducting private school instruction on the elementary or high school level.

(j) Where reasonable access to the statewide electronic fingerprinting network is available, the Department of Justice may request electronic submission of the fingerprint cards and other information required by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 313, Sec. 6.   (AB 2796)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

33193.

(a) A private school contracting with an entity for the construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, or repair of a school facility where the employees of the entity will have contact, other than limited contact, with pupils shall ensure the safety of the pupils by one or more of the following methods:

(1) The installation of a physical barrier at the worksite to limit contact with pupils.

(2) Continual supervision and monitoring of all employees of the entity by an employee of the entity whom the Department of Justice has ascertained has not been convicted of a violent or serious felony. For purposes of this paragraph, an employee of the entity may submit his or her fingerprints to the Department of Justice pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 33192 and the department shall comply with subdivision (d) of Section 33192.

(3) Surveillance of employees of the entity by school personnel.

(b) An entity that contracts with a private school for the construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, or repair of a school facility is not required to comply with the requirements of Section 33192 if one or more of the methods described in subdivision (a) is utilized.

(c) This section shall not apply to an entity providing construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, or repair services to a school district in an emergency or exceptional situation, such as when pupil health or safety is endangered or when repairs are needed to make school facilities safe and habitable.

(d) (1) For purposes of this section, “private school” means a person, firm, association, partnership, or corporation offering or conducting private school instruction on the elementary or high school level.

(2) For purposes of this section, a violent felony is any felony listed in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5 of the Penal Code and a serious felony is any felony listed in subdivision (c) of Section 1192.7 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 840, Sec. 2.   Effective September 25, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Verification of Heritage School Operation [33195. - 33195.6.]

33195.

(a) Every person, firm, association, partnership, or corporation operating a heritage school as defined in Section 33195.4 shall, between the 1st and 31st day of January of each year, commencing on January 1, 2011, file with the Superintendent an electronic registration form, under penalty of perjury, by the owner or other head setting forth the following information for the current year:

(1) All names, whether real or fictitious, of the person, firm, association, partnership, or corporation under which it has done and is doing business.

(2) The address, including city and street, of the location at which the heritage school delivers services to pupils.

(3) The names and addresses, including city and street, of the directors, if any, and principal officers of the person, firm, association, partnership, or corporation.

(4) The school enrollment, by grade span, number of teachers, and coeducational or enrollment limited to boys or girls.

(5) That the following records are maintained at the address stated, and are true and accurate:

(A) The courses of study offered by the institution.

(B) The names and addresses, including city and street, of its faculty, together with a record of the educational qualifications of each faculty member.

(6) Criminal record summary information that has
 been obtained pursuant to Section 44237.

(7) The heritage school telephone number.

(8) Acknowledgment that the director of the heritage school and all employees are mandated reporters and subject to the requirements established by the Child Abuse and Neglect Reporting Act (Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 11164) of Chapter 2 of Title 1 of Part 4 of the Penal Code) and, consistent with that act, certification that:

(A) The employer is aware that it is encouraged to provide its employees with training in the duties imposed by the act.

(B) Employees have signed a statement provided by the employer that the employees have knowledge of the act and will comply with its provisions.

(C) Employees have been notified by the employer of their reporting obligations and confidentiality rights, pursuant to Section 11165.9 of the Penal Code.

(b) If two or more heritage schools are under the effective control or supervision of a single administrative unit, the administrative unit shall comply with the provisions of this section by submitting an electronic registration form on behalf of every heritage school under its effective control or supervision.

(c) Filing pursuant to this section shall not be interpreted to mean, and it shall be unlawful for a school to expressly or impliedly represent, that the State of California, the Superintendent, the state board, the department or a division or bureau of the department, or an accrediting agency has made an evaluation, recognition, approval, or endorsement of the school or course, unless this is an actual
 fact.

(d) Filing pursuant to this section does not grant a heritage school a right to receive state funding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 76, Sec. 32.   (AB 383)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

33195.1.

(a) Commencing January 1, 2011, the electronic registration form filed with the Superintendent pursuant to Section 33195 shall, under penalty of perjury, include a statement manifesting compliance with the following paragraph:

(1) A person, firm, association, partnership, or corporation offering or conducting heritage school instruction shall not employ a person who would be prohibited from employment by a public school district pursuant to any provision of this code because of his or her conviction for any crime.

(b) In the case of any heritage school where an instructor also serves as the administrator of the school, the electronic
 registration form shall be made available upon request to the parents or guardians of all pupils currently enrolled in the school and to any parent or guardian considering whether to enroll his or her child in the school.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 286, Sec. 1.   (SB 1116)   Effective September 24, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

33195.2.

(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), if the employees of any entity that has a contract with a heritage school to provide any of the following services may have any contact with pupils, those employees shall submit or have submitted their fingerprints in a manner authorized by the Department of Justice together with a fee determined by the Department of Justice to be sufficient to reimburse the department for its costs incurred in processing the application:

(1) School and classroom janitorial.

(2) Schoolsite administrative.

(3) Schoolsite
 grounds and landscape maintenance.

(4) Pupil transportation.

(5) Schoolsite food-related services.

(b) This section does not apply to an entity providing any of the services listed in subdivision (a) to a heritage school in an emergency or exceptional situation, such as when a pupil’s health or safety is endangered or when repairs are needed to make school facilities safe and habitable.

(c) This section does not apply to an entity providing any of the services listed in subdivision (a) to a heritage school when the heritage school determines that the employees of the entity will have limited contact with pupils. In determining whether a contract employee has
 limited contact with pupils, the heritage school shall consider the totality of the circumstances, including factors such as the length of time the contractors will be on school grounds, whether pupils will be in proximity with the site where the contractors will be working, and whether the contractors will be working by themselves or with others. If a heritage school has made this determination, the heritage school shall take appropriate steps to protect the safety of any pupils that may come in contact with these employees.

(d) A heritage school may determine, on a case-by-case basis, to require an entity providing schoolsite services other than those listed in subdivision (a) or those described in Section 33195.3 and the entity’s employees to comply with the requirements of this section, unless the heritage school determines that the
 employees of the entity will have limited contact with pupils. In determining whether a contract employee will have limited contact with pupils, the heritage school shall consider the totality of the circumstances, including factors such as the length of time the contractors will be on school grounds, whether pupils will be in proximity with the site where the contractors will be working, and whether the contractors will be working by themselves or with others. If a heritage school makes this determination, the heritage school shall take appropriate steps to protect the safety of any pupils that may come in contact with these employees. If a heritage school requires an entity providing services other than those listed in subdivision (a) and its employees to comply with the requirements of this section, the Department of Justice shall comply with subdivision (e).

(e) (1) The heritage school contractor shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information required by the Department of Justice of all employees of entities, as identified in subdivisions (a) and (d), that contract with a heritage school, as defined in Section 33195.4, for the purposes of obtaining information as to the existence and content of a record of state or federal convictions and state or federal arrests and also information as to the existence and content of a record of state and federal arrests for which the Department of Justice establishes that the person is free on bail or on their own recognizance pending trail or appeal.

(2) A request for records pursuant to this section shall be conducted pursuant to Section
 11105.3 of the Penal Code.

(3) The Department of Justice shall provide a state and federal response to the heritage school contractor pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(f) An entity having a contract as specified in subdivision (a) and an entity required to comply with this section pursuant to subdivision (d) shall not permit an employee to come in contact with pupils until the Department of Justice has ascertained that the employee has not been convicted of a felony as defined in Section 45122.1.

(1) This prohibition does not apply to an employee solely on the basis that the employee has been convicted of a felony if the employee has obtained a certificate of rehabilitation and pardon pursuant
 to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 4852.01) of Title 6 of Part 3 of the Penal Code.

(2) This prohibition does not apply to an employee solely on the basis that the employee has been convicted of a serious felony that is not also a violent felony if that employee can prove to the sentencing court of the offense in question, by clear and convincing evidence, that they have been rehabilitated for the purposes of schoolsite employment for at least one year. If the offense in question occurred outside this state, then the person may seek a finding of rehabilitation from the court having jurisdiction where they are a resident.

(g) An entity having a contract as specified in subdivision (a) and an entity required to comply with this section pursuant to subdivision (d) shall
 certify in writing to the heritage school that neither the employer nor any of its employees who are required by this section to submit or have their fingerprints submitted to the Department of Justice and who may come in contact with pupils have been convicted of a felony as defined in Section 45122.1.

(h) An entity having a contract as specified in subdivision (a) on the effective date of the act adding this section and an entity required to comply with this section pursuant to subdivision (d) by a heritage school with which it has a contract on the effective date of the act adding this section shall complete the requirements of this section within 90 days of that date.

(i) Where reasonable access to the statewide electronic fingerprinting network is available, the Department of
 Justice may request electronic submission of the fingerprint cards and other information required by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 313, Sec. 7.   (AB 2796)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

33195.3.

(a) A heritage school contracting with an entity for the construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, or repair of a school facility where the employees of the entity will have contact, other than limited contact, with pupils shall ensure the safety of the pupils by one or more of the following methods:

(1) The installation of a physical barrier at the worksite to limit contact with pupils.

(2) Continual supervision and monitoring of all employees of the entity by an employee of the entity whom the Department of Justice has ascertained has not been convicted of a violent or serious felony. For purposes of this paragraph, an employee of
 the entity may submit his or her fingerprints to the Department of Justice pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 33195.2 and the Department of Justice shall comply with subdivision (d) of Section 33195.2.

(3) Surveillance of employees of the entity by school personnel.

(b) An entity that contracts with a heritage school for the construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, or repair of a school facility is not required to comply with the requirements of Section 33195.2 if one or more of the methods described in subdivision (a) is utilized.

(c) (1) This section shall not apply to an entity providing construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, or repair services to a school facility in an emergency or exceptional situation, such as when a pupil’s health or safety is endangered or when repairs
 are needed to make school facilities safe and habitable.

(2) For purposes of this section, a violent felony means any felony listed in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5 of the Penal Code and a serious felony means any felony listed in subdivision (c) of Section 1192.7 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 286, Sec. 1.   (SB 1116)   Effective September 24, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

33195.4.

For purposes of this article, “heritage school” means a school that serves children who are at least 4 years and 9 months of age and no older than 18 years of age, who attend a public or private full-time day school, that does all of the following:

(a) Specifies regular hours of operation.

(b) Offers education or academic tutoring, or both, in a world language.

(c) Offers education on the culture, traditions, or history of a country other than the United States.

(d) Offers culturally enriching activities, including, but not limited to, art, dancing, games, or singing, based on the culture or
 customs of a country other than the United States.

(e) Maintains membership in a state or national cultural or language association.

(f) Complies with relevant local government regulations, where applicable.

(g) Does not operate out of a residential home.

(h) Complies with the requirements of Section 33195 and maintains in its possession a copy of the registration form electronically filed with the Superintendent. The heritage school shall make this form available upon request, including to the State Department of Social Services, to verify exemption from child care licensure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 865, Sec. 5.   (AB 2319)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

33195.5.

(a) The Heritage Enrichment Resource Fund is hereby established in the State Treasury. Moneys deposited in the fund may be expended by the Superintendent upon appropriation by statute, for the purposes of this article.

(b) The electronic registration form to be filed pursuant to this article shall be filed together with a fee determined by the Superintendent to be sufficient to cover, but not exceed, the costs of the department in implementing this article. The fees shall be deposited into the Heritage Enrichment Resource Fund. The fee shall be received by the Superintendent no later than
 January 31 of each year in which the registration form is filed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 286, Sec. 1.   (SB 1116)   Effective September 24, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

33195.6.

(a) A director of a heritage school shall undergo at least 15 hours of health and safety training. The training shall include all of the following components:

(1) Pediatric first aid.

(2) Pediatric cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR).

(3) A preventive health practices course or courses that include instruction in the recognition, management, and prevention of infectious diseases, including immunizations, and prevention of childhood injuries.

(4) Training in pediatric first aid and CPR pursuant to paragraphs
 (1) and (2) shall be provided by a program approved by the American Red Cross, the American Heart Association, or the Emergency Medical Services Authority pursuant to Section 1797.191 of the Health and Safety Code.

(5) Training in preventive health practices pursuant to paragraph (3) shall be provided by a training program approved by the Emergency Medical Services Authority.

(6) In addition to the training programs specified in paragraphs (4) and (5), training programs or courses in pediatric first aid, pediatric CPR, and preventive health practices offered or approved by an accredited postsecondary educational institution are considered to be approved sources of training that may be used to satisfy the training requirements of paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive.

(7) Persons who, prior to the effective date of this
 section, have completed a course or courses in preventive health practices as described in paragraph (3), and have a certificate of completion of a course or courses in preventive health practices, or certified copies of transcripts that identify the number of hours and the specific course or courses taken for training in preventive health practices, shall be deemed to have met the training requirement for preventive health practices pursuant to paragraph (3).

(b) All employees and volunteers of a heritage school shall be in good health, as verified by a health screening, including a test for tuberculosis, performed by, or under the supervision of, a licensed physician and surgeon.

(c) Pupils attending heritage schools shall have access to working sinks, toilets, and drinking water.

(d) No pupil attending a heritage
 school shall have access to medication or cleaning supplies, except as otherwise provided by law.

(e) A heritage school, as defined in Section 33195.4, shall not be subject to licensure by the State Department of Social Services as a child day care center pursuant to Chapter 3.4 (commencing with Section 1596.70) or Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 1596.90) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(f) Upon a pupil’s enrollment in a heritage school, the heritage school shall provide a notice to the pupil’s parent or guardian stating that the heritage school is exempt from child care licensure, and that attendance at a heritage school does not satisfy California’s compulsory education requirements pursuant to Section 48200.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 286, Sec. 1.   (SB 1116)   Effective September 24, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. State Department of Education [33300. - 33479.9.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [33300. - 33319.6.]

33300.

There is in the state government a State Department of Education. Any reference to the Department of Education shall be deemed to be a reference to the State Department of Education, unless the context otherwise requires.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1059, Sec. 3.   Effective September 26, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

33301.

The Department of Education shall be administered through:

(a) The State Board of Education which shall be the governing and policy determining body of the department.

(b) The Director of Education in whom all executive and administrative functions of the department are vested and who is the executive officer of the State Board of Education.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

33302.

The Department of Education shall be conducted under the control of an executive officer known as the Director of Education.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

33303.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction is ex officio Director of Education.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

33304.

The provisions of Article 2 (commencing with Section 11180), Chapter 2, Part 1, Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, shall govern and apply to the conduct of the Department of Education in every respect as if such provisions were herein set forth at length.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

33305.

Wherever in Article 2 (commencing with Section 11180), Chapter 2, Part 1, Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the term “head of the department,” or similar designation occurs, it shall, for the purposes of Section 33304, of this code mean the Director of Education.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

33306.

The Department of Education is the successor to, and is vested with all the duties, powers, purposes, responsibilities, and jurisdiction of the State Board of Education as they existed on July 30, 1921, of the board of directors of the California School for the Deaf and the Blind, and of the several officers, deputies, and employees of such bodies and offices.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

33307.

The Department of Education shall be in possession and control of all records, books, papers, offices, equipment, supplies, moneys, funds, appropriations, land, and other property, real or personal, now or hereafter held for the benefit of the bodies, offices, and officers whose duties, powers, purposes, responsibilities, and jurisdiction are transferred to and vested in the Department of Education.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

33308.

The Department of Education shall administer and enforce all laws now or hereafter imposing any duty, power, or function upon any of the bodies, offices, officers, deputies, or employees transferred to the Department of Education under the provisions of Section 33306.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

33308.1.

The State Department of Education shall adopt guidelines to be disseminated to parents or guardians of pupils that describe the procedures that a parent or guardian can follow in filing a complaint of child abuse, as defined in Section 11165.6 of the Penal Code, with the school or a child protective services agency against a school employee or other person that commits an act of child abuse, as defined in Section 11165.6 of the Penal Code, against a pupil at a schoolsite.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1102, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

33308.5.

(a) Program guidelines issued by the State Department of Education shall be designed to serve as a model or example, and shall not be prescriptive. Program guidelines issued by the department shall include written notification that the guidelines are merely exemplary, and that compliance with the guidelines is not mandatory.

(b) The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall review all program guidelines prepared by the State Department of Education prior to issuance to local education agencies. The superintendent shall approve the proposed guidelines only if he or she determines that all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The guidelines are necessary.

(2) The department has the authority to issue the guidelines.

(3) The guidelines are clear and appropriately referenced to, and consistent with, existing statutes and regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 498, Sec. 16.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

33309.

In addition to the Division of Libraries of the Department of Education, established by law, the State Board of Education may, upon recommendation of the Director of Education, establish such divisions as in the judgment of the board are necessary for the proper transaction of the business of the department.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

33310.

The State Department of Education may sell any educational materials and directories related to its scope and duties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 825, Sec. 9.   Effective October 9, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

33311.

When the Department of Education fixes the price of any publication, it shall specify the class of persons or institutions that may receive copies of the publication free of charge.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

33312.

Any county, or any school district, in this state may purchase the publications described in Sections 33309 to 33313, inclusive, from the Department of Education.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

33313.

All moneys received from the sale of materials pursuant to Section 33310 of the Education Code shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the fund against which the cost of printing the publication was charged.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1158, Sec. 3.   Effective September 30, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

33314.

The State Board of Education may, upon recommendation of the Director of Education, establish in the Department of Education a school library consultant service to assist and advise local school districts in the establishment, development, and improvement of school libraries in the elementary and secondary schools of the state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

33315.

(a) The Superintendent shall establish and implement a system of complaint processing, known as the Uniform Complaint Procedures, for educational programs specified in paragraph (1). The department shall review the regulations set forth in Chapter 5.1 (commencing with Section 4600) of Division 1 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations pertaining to uniform complaint procedures and, on or before March 31, 2019, shall commence rulemaking proceedings to revise those regulations, as necessary, to conform to all of the following:

(1) The Uniform Complaint Procedures shall apply to all of the following:

(A) Adult
 education programs established pursuant to Sections 8500 to 8538, inclusive, and Sections 52500 to 52617, inclusive.

(B) Consolidated categorical aid programs as listed in subdivision (a) of Section 64000.

(C) Migrant child education established pursuant to Sections 54440 to 54445, inclusive.

(D) Career technical and technical education and career technical and technical training programs established pursuant to Sections 52300 to 52462, inclusive.

(E) Childcare and development programs established pursuant to Sections 8200 to 8498, inclusive.

(F) The
 filing of complaints that allege unlawful discrimination, harassment, intimidation, or bullying against any protected group as identified under Sections 200 and 220 and Section 11135 of the Government Code, including any actual or perceived characteristic as set forth in Section 422.55 of the Penal Code, or on the basis of a person’s association with a person or group with one or more of these actual or perceived characteristics, in any program or activity conducted by an educational institution, as defined in Section 210.3, that is funded directly by, or that receives or benefits from, any state financial assistance.

(G) Lactation accommodations pursuant to Section 222.

(H) Educational rights of foster youth pursuant to Sections 48853, 48853.5, and 49069.5, and graduation requirements
 for foster youth, homeless youth, and other youth pursuant to Section 51225.1.

(I) Pupil fees pursuant to Sections 49010 to 49013, inclusive.

(J) Courses of study pursuant to Section 51228.3.

(K) Instructional minutes for physical education pursuant to Section 51223.

(L) Local control and accountability plans pursuant to Section 52075.

(M) Juvenile court schools pursuant to Section 48645.7.

(N) School safety plans pursuant to Section 32289.

(O) Deficiencies related to preschool
 health and safety issues for a California state preschool program pursuant to Section 8235.5.

(P) School or athletic team names, mascots, or nicknames pursuant to Section 221.3.

(Q) Any other state or federal educational program the Superintendent deems appropriate.

(2) As it pertains to child nutrition programs and established pursuant to Sections 49490 to 49570, inclusive, and special education programs established pursuant to Sections 56000 to 56865, inclusive, and Sections 59000 to 59300, inclusive, the Uniform Complaint Procedures shall expressly reference the federal provisions that govern complaints relative to these programs, as well as any additional applicable rules included within Title 5 of the
 California Code of Regulations.

(3) The department shall develop a pamphlet for parents that will explain the Uniform Complaint Procedures in a user-friendly manner and post this pamphlet on the department’s internet website.

(4) Except for cases of complaints related to paragraph (2), a complainant who appeals a decision of a local educational agency under the Uniform Complaint Procedures set forth in Chapter 5.1 (commencing with Section 4600) of Division 1 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations to the department shall receive a written appeal decision within 60 days of the department’s receipt of the appeal, unless extended by written agreement with the complainant or the department documents exceptional circumstances and informs the complainant.
